Virginia statutes. Title 34. Homestead and Other Exemptions.
Chapter 3. Other Articles Exempt.

§ 34-26.
Poor debtor’s exemption; exempt articles enumerated.

In addition to the exemptions provided in Chapter 2 (§

34-4

et seq.), every householder shall be entitled to hold exempt from creditor process the following enumerated items:

The family Bible.

Family portraits and family heirlooms not to exceed $5,000 in value.

A lot in a burial ground, and (ii) any preneed funeral contract not to exceed $5,000.
3. (i) A lot in a burial ground, and (ii) any preneed funeral contract not to exceed $5,000.

All wearing apparel of the householder not to exceed $1,000 in value.

All animals owned as pets, such as cats, dogs, birds, squirrels, rabbits and other pets not kept or raised for sale or profit.

Medically prescribed health aids.

Tools, books, instruments, implements, equipment, and machines, including motor vehicles, vessels, and aircraft, which are necessary for use in the course of the householder’s occupation or trade not exceeding $10,000 in value, except that a perfected security interest on such personal property shall have priority over the claim of exemption under this section. A motor vehicle, vessel or aircraft used to commute to and from a place of occupation or trade and not otherwise necessary for use in the course of such occupation or trade shall not be exempt under this subdivision. “Occupation,” as used in this subdivision, includes enrollment in any public or private elementary, secondary, or career and technical education school or institution of higher education.

Motor vehicles, not held as exempt under subdivision 7, owned by the householder, not to exceed a total of $6,000 in value, except that a perfected security interest on a motor vehicle shall have priority over the claim of exemption under this subdivision.

Those portions of a tax refund or governmental payment attributable to the Child Tax Credit or Additional Child Tax Credit pursuant to § 24 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the Earned Income Credit pursuant to § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

Unpaid spousal or child support.The value of an item claimed as exempt under this section shall be the fair market value of the item less any prior security interest.The monetary limits, where provided, are applicable to the total value of property claimed as exempt under that subdivision.The purchase of an item claimed as exempt under this section with nonexempt property in contemplation of bankruptcy or creditor process shall not be deemed to be in fraud of creditors.No officer or other person shall levy or distrain upon, or attach, such articles, or otherwise seek to subject such articles to any lien or process. It shall not be required that a householder designate any property exempt under this section in a deed in order to secure such exemption.

1a.

Wedding and engagement rings.

4a.

All household furnishings including, but not limited to, beds, dressers, floor coverings, stoves, refrigerators, washing machines, dryers, sewing machines, pots and pans for cooking, plates, and eating utensils, not to exceed $5,000 in value.

4b.

Firearms, not to exceed a total of $3,000 in value.

History.

Code 1919, § 6552; 1934, p. 371; 1936, p. 322; 1956, c. 637; 1970, c. 428; 1975, c. 466; 1976, c. 150; 1977, cc. 253, 496; 1990, c. 942; 1992, c. 644; 1993, c. 150; 2001, c. 483; 2002, c. 88; 2011, cc. 761, 835; 2015, c. 686.

Cross references.

As to injunction to protect this exemption, see §

34-2

.

As to liability of articles exempt under this section and §

34-27

for taxes and levies and for their purchase price, see §

34-3

.

As to other exemptions, see §§

8.01-489

,

8.01-563

,

34-27

,

34-29

,

34-33

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “career and technical education” for “vocational” near the end of subdivision (7).

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 88 changed the subdivision designations from (1) through (8) to 1. through 8.; in subdivision 3, added the clause (i) designation and added clause (ii); in subdivision 7, substituted “subdivision” for “subsection” at the end of the second sentence; and in subdivision 8, substituted “subdivision 7” for “subdivision (7)” and “subdivision” for “subsection.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 761 and 835 are identical, and added subdivision 4b, substituted “not to exceed $6,000” for “not to exceed $2,000” in subdivision 8, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 686 substituted “Firearms, not to exceed a total of $3,000” for “One firearm, not to exceed $3000” in subdivision 4b; in subdivision 8 substituted “Motor vehicles” for “A motor vehicle” and “exceed a total of $6000” for “exceed $6000”; added subdivisions 9 and 10, and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For comment, “In re Cheeseman: A Judicial Revision of Virginia’s Homestead Exemption Laws,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 391 (1982).

For article, “How Bankruptcy Exemptions Work: Virginia As an Illustration of Why the ‘Opt Out’ Clause Was a Bad Idea,” see 8 G.M.U. L. Rev. 1 (1985).

For survey on creditor’s rights in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

For 1991 survey on bankruptcy law, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 607 (1991).

For essay, “A Distinction Without a Difference? An Examination of the Legal and Ethical Difference Between Asset Protection and Fraudulent Transfers Under Virginia Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 381 (2012).

For article, “Commercial Bribery: Choice and Measurement Within a Remedies Smorgasbord,” see 74 Wash & Lee L. Rev. 369 (2017).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18 Enforcement of Judgments and Decrees. § 18.01 Exemptions from Execution. Bryson.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3 The Writ Firea Facies: Execution. § 3.3 Relief from Levy; § 11.4 Exempt Property. Rendleman.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-586 Homestead Deed.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C M.J. Bankruptcy, §§ 72, 76, 78; 8A M.J. Executions, § 20; 8A M.J. Exemptions from Execution and Attachment, §§ 6, 8, 21.

§ 34-27.
Additional articles exempted to householder engaged in agriculture.

If the householder be at the time actually engaged in the business of agriculture, there shall also be exempt from such levy or distress, while he is so engaged, to be selected by him or his agent, the following articles, or so many thereof as he may have, to wit: a pair of horses or mules unless he selects or has selected a horse or mule under §

34-26

, in which case he shall be entitled to select under this section only one, with the necessary gearing, one wagon or cart, one tractor, not exceeding in value $3,000, two plows, one drag, one harvest cradle, one pitchfork, one rake, two iron wedges and fertilizer and fertilizer material not exceeding in value $1,000. It shall not be required that a householder designate any property exempt under this section in a deed in order to secure such exemption.

History.

Code 1919, § 6533; 1932, p. 324; 1956, c. 637; 1970, c. 428; 1977, c. 496; 1993, c. 150.

Cross references.

As to waiver of exemptions, see §

34-22

.

The 1993 amendment

added the second sentence.

Law Review.

For comment, “In re Cheeseman: A Judicial Revision of Virginia’s Homestead Exemption Laws,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 391 (1982).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18. Enforcement of Judgments and Decrees. § 18.02 Exemptions from Execution. Bryson.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3. The Writ Firea Facies: Execution. § 3.3 Relief from Levy; § 3.5 Property Subject to Execution. Rendleman.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C M.J. Bankruptcy, § 78; 8A M.J. Executions, § 20; 8A M.J. Exemptions from Executions and Attachments, §§ 6, 8, 21.

§ 34-28.
Deed of trust, etc., on such property void.

Every deed of trust, mortgage or other writing or pledge made by a householder to give a lien on property exempt from distress or levy under §

34-26

shall be void as to such property. However, this section shall have no application to (i) property covered by a deed of trust, mortgage or other writing or pledge given by a householder to secure a loan made for the purchase of such property or (ii) security interests in such property having priority over the claim of exemption as specifically provided in subdivisions 7 and 8 of §

34-26

.

History.

Code 1919, § 6564; 1938, p. 218; 1940, p. 615; 1992, c. 644; 2002, c. 88.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 88 substituted “in subdivisions 7 and 8 of §

34-26

” for “in subsections (7) and (8) of §

34-26

.”

Law Review.

For article, “How Bankruptcy Exemptions Work: Virginia As an Illustration of Why the ‘Opt Out’ Clause Was a Bad Idea,” see 8 G.M.U. L. Rev. 1 (1985).

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3. The Writ Firea Facies: Execution. § 3.3 Relief from Levy; § 11.4 Exempt Property. Rendleman

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Exemptions from Execution and Attachment, §§ 21, 25; 13A M.J. Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 19.

§ 34-28.1.
Personal injury and wrongful death actions exempt; exceptions.

Except for liens created under Article 7.1 (§

8.01-66.2

et seq.) of Title 8.01, Article 5 (§

54.1-3932

et seq.) of Title 54.1, and Chapter 19 (§

63.2-1900

et seq.) of Title 63.2, all causes of action for personal injury or wrongful death and the proceeds derived from court award or settlement shall be exempt from creditor process against the injured person or statutory beneficiary as defined in Article 5 (§

8.01-50

et seq.) of Title 8.01. It shall not be required that a householder designate any property exempt under this section in a deed in order to secure such exemption. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to affect any voluntary assignment of the proceeds or anticipated proceeds of a personal injury or wrongful death award or settlement as permitted by §

8.01-26

.

History.

1990, c. 942; 1991, c. 256; 1993, c. 150; 1994, c. 35; 2003, cc. 929, 942.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 929 and 942 are identical, and in the first sentence, deleted “and” following “Title 8.01,” and inserted “and Chapter 19 (§

63.2-1900

et seq.) of Title 63.2.”

Law Review.

For 1991 survey on bankruptcy law, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 607 (1991).

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3. The Writ Firea Facies: Execution. § 3.3 Relief from Levy, etc.; § 4.7 Wages and Statutory Exemptions. Rendleman.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C Bankruptcy, § 79, 81; 8A M.J. Exemptions from Execution and Attachment, § 21.

§ 34-28.2.
Spousal and child support exempt.

The debtor’s right to receive spousal or child support, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor and any dependent of the debtor, shall be exempt from creditor process.

History.

2015, c. 686.

§ 34-28.3.
Emergency relief payments exempt.

For the purposes of this section, “emergency relief payment” means a 2020 recovery rebate for individuals and qualifying children provided pursuant to § 2201 of the federal Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (P.L. 116-136) or any future federal payments or rebates provided directly to individuals for economic relief or stimulus due to the COVID-19 pandemic.

All emergency relief payments paid to individuals shall be automatically exempt from the creditor process. Any financial institution, as defined by §

6.2-100

, receiving such payments directly from the federal government shall exempt such payments from the creditor process if (i) the payment is marked by the federal government as an “emergency relief payment” or includes some other unique identifier that is reasonably sufficient to allow the financial institution to identify the funds as an emergency relief payment or (ii) the federal government or accountholder receiving the emergency relief payment gives notice to the financial institution of such payment. In exempting emergency relief payments on deposit from the creditor process, a financial institution shall look back two months preceding the date of receipt of service of the creditor process. The financial institution shall perform a one-time account review separately for each account in the name of an account holder who is subject to the creditor process without consideration for any other attributes of the account or the creditor process, including (a) the presence of other funds, from whatever source, that may be commingled in the account with funds from an emergency relief payment; (b) the existence of a co-owner on the account; and (c) the balance in the account, provided the balance is above zero dollars on the date of account review. After conducting the account review, a financial institution shall exempt from the creditor process the lesser of the sum of all posted emergency relief payments to an account between the close of business on the beginning date of the lookback period and the open of business on the ending date of the lookback period or the balance in an account when the account review is performed.

If the creditor process involves a court return date, such as a garnishment, and requires a continued hold on the account, including any deposits made up to the return date, then if an emergency relief payment is deposited into an account after the completion of the account review but before the creditor process or garnishment return date and the account holder notifies the financial institution that the deposit of an emergency relief payment has been made, the financial institution must review the account. If the financial institution verifies that the deposited funds are exempt under this section, then such deposited funds shall be treated as exempt from the creditor process or garnishment. This second account review shall begin within two business days of receiving the notice from the account holder and shall cover the period from the start of business on the date of the completion of the previous account review to the end of business on the date of the notification from the account holder. For any creditor process that requires a continued hold, such as a garnishment where the account hold must continue until the garnishment return date, the account holder may access exempt funds by withdrawal as permitted by the financial institution.

In its answer to the creditor process, the financial institution shall state the amount of account funds that are being held pursuant to the creditor process and the amount of account funds that were treated as exempt under this section.

A financial institution that makes a good faith effort to comply with the requirements set forth herein shall not be subject to liability or regulatory action under any state law, regulation, court or other order, or regulatory interpretation for actions concerning any emergency relief payments.

Emergency relief payments shall be exempt from the creditor process even if deposited into an account with a financial institution or other organization accepting deposits and thereby commingled with other funds.

For the purposes of this section, no such exemption shall extend to child support, spousal support, or criminal restitution orders.

If a financial institution does not set aside an emergency relief payment as exempt from the creditor process, then the accountholder receiving such payment must claim the exemption within the time limits prescribed by subsection B of §

34-17

and in the manner prescribed under §

8.01-512.4

.

History.

2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 39; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552; 2022, , Sp. Sess. I, c. 1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 39, cl. 3, effective October 28, 2020, provides: “The exemption created by this act shall not extend to a garnishment process or other creditor process that concluded before the enactment of this act.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, cl. 13, effective April 7, 2021, deleted “not to exceed $1,200 per individual per payment or rebate, and not to exceed $500 for each qualifying child paid to the individual per payment or rebate” at the end of subsection A.

The 2022 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2022 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 9, cl. 13 amended this section without change.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 28, 2020.